Tennessee, session 114, HB2474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-198(l)(1)(A), is amended by
adding the language "when a warning flasher or flashers are in operation or during times when
children are present if the school zone does not have a warning flasher or flashers" immediately
following the language "Within the designated distance of a marked school zone".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2474
010668
- 1 -